Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.129

Demonstration and research license—Fees—Requirements.

Except as provided in RCW 17.21.203, it is unlawful for a person to use or supervise the use of any experimental use pesticide or any restricted use pesticide on small experimental plots for research purposes when no charge is made for the pesticide and its application without a demonstration and research applicator's license.

(1) Application for a demonstration and research license must be accompanied by a fee of forty-three dollars.

(2) Persons licensed under this section are exempt from the requirements of RCW 17.21.160, 17.21.170, and 17.21.180.

[ 2021 c 244 s 12; 2008 c 285 s 25; 1997 c 242 s 15; 1994 c 283 s 14; 1993 sp.s. c 19 s 8; 1992 c 170 s 8; 1991 c 109 s 34; 1989 c 380 s 43; 1987 c 45 s 30; 1981 c 297 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.